Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5655.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-59-1 and 11-59-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-59 entitled
"Stalking" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-59-1. Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) “Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a
period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not
included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”
(2) “Harasses,” as it relates to § 11-59-2 (a) and (b), means a knowing and willful course
of conduct directed at a specific person with the intent to seriously alarm, annoy, or bother the
person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would
cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.
"Harasses," as it relates to § 11-59-2 (c), means a knowing and willful course of conduct directed
at a specific person that a reasonable person would consider seriously annoying or seriously
tormenting and that serves no legitimate purpose and includes, but is not limited to, the act or acts
of repeatedly following someone and using an electronic device to record their movements in any
public or private place.
11-59-2. Stalking prohibited.
(a) Any person who: (1) harasses another person; or (2) willfully, maliciously, and
repeatedly follows another person with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear of bodily

injury, is guilty of the crime of stalking.
(b) Stalking shall be deemed a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five
(5) years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.
(c) Any person who harasses another person by following someone and using an electronic
device to record their movements in any public or private place, which act or acts serve no
legitimate purpose, shall be guilty of video harassment and punished by imprisonment of not more
than one year, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001992
========
LC001992 - Page 2 of 3